Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-287
Public lands; occupation as townsite; deeds validated.

All deeds made prior to July 5, 1907, for such townsite, lots or lands therein situated, made by corporate officers or county judges, are declared to be valid.

Laws 1907, c. 155, § 3, p. 487;

R.S.1913, § 6286;

C.S.1922, § 5805;

C.S.1929, § 76-806;

R.S.1943, § 76-287.